Nebraska, session 109, LB1246.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1246 LB1246
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 58-201, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
58-201 Sections 58-201 to 58-273 and section 2 of this act shall be
known and may be cited as the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority Act.
Sec. 2. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Budget administrator means the budget administrator of the
budget division of the Department of Administrative Services; and
(b) Public funds has the same meaning as in section 81-11,106.
(2) The authority shall:
(a) Record all revenue, fund balances, and expenditures from all
public funds in an accounting system;
(b) Submit a report to the budget administrator, the Legislative
Fiscal Analyst, and the Director of Economic Development showing the
condition of public funds held by the authority. Such report shall be
submitted at least twenty days before the commencement of each regular
session of the Legislature;
(c) Submit an accounting of transactions undertaken with public
funds to the budget administrator, the Legislative Fiscal Analyst, and
the Director of Economic Development. Such accounting shall be submitted
on a monthly basis and at the request of the budget administrator, the
Legislative Fiscal Analyst, or the Director of Economic Development. Such
accounting shall include the amount of payments on grant and loan awards
with public funds, invoices of expenditures made on grant and loan awards
with public funds, and expenditures on administration and contracting
which utilized public funds; and
(d) Furnish to the budget administrator, the Legislative Fiscal
Analyst, and the Director of Economic Development, at any such
individual's request, any information in the authority's possession,
including records received from other officers, boards, commissions, or
departments of state government, whether such information is retained in
computer files or otherwise, if such information is directly related to
-2-

LB1246 LB1246
2026 2026
the expenditure, planned or actual, of public funds.
Sec. 3. Section 58-708, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
58-708 (1) During each calendar year in which funds are available
from the Affordable Housing Trust Fund for use by the Department of
Economic Development, the department shall make its best efforts to
allocate not less than thirty percent of such funds to each congressional
district. The department shall announce a grant and loan application
period of at least ninety days duration for all projects. Before a grant
application for any new construction project can be submitted to the
department, the land for the project shall be identified. In selecting
projects to receive trust fund assistance, the department shall develop a
qualified allocation plan and give first priority to financially viable
projects that serve the lowest income occupants for the longest period of
time. The qualified allocation plan shall:
(a) Set forth selection criteria to be used to determine housing
priorities of the housing trust fund which are appropriate to local
conditions, including the community's immediate need for affordable
housing, proposed increases in home ownership, private dollars leveraged,
level of local government support and participation, and repayment, in
part or in whole, of financial assistance awarded by the fund; and
(b) Give first priority in allocating trust fund assistance among
selected projects to those projects which are located in whole or in part
within an enterprise zone designated pursuant to the Enterprise Zone Act
or an opportunity zone designated pursuant to the federal Tax Cuts and
Jobs Act, Public Law 115-97, serve the lowest income occupant, are
located in an area that has been declared an extremely blighted area
under section 18-2101.02, and are obligated to serve qualified occupants
for the longest period of time.
(2) Beginning on July 1, 2026:
(a) The Department of Economic Development shall disburse grant
-3-

LB1246 LB1246
2026 2026
funds to a qualified recipient equal to eighty percent of the housing
development costs of such recipient, excluding general administration
costs, housing management fees, lead-based paint test costs, and
technical assistance costs, once the department approves such recipient
for grant funds; and
(b) The department shall disburse grant funds to a qualified
recipient equal to twenty percent of the housing development costs of
such recipient, excluding general administration costs, housing
management fees, lead-based paint test costs, and technical assistance
costs, upon the completion of the project.
(3)(a) Beginning on October 1, 2025, a qualified recipient shall
submit to the Department of Economic Development a schedule of uses of
funds for eligible activities on a quarterly basis, no later than thirty
days after the end of each calendar quarter, during the time of
performance under the award agreement.
(b) The schedule of uses of funds for eligible activities shall
include an itemization of costs for eligible activities. If reasonable,
the department may require source documentation and proof of payment,
including, but not limited to, a paid invoice, completed payment, or
cleared check, to be submitted with the schedule as evidence of
appropriate use of funds. Qualified recipients shall ensure proper use of
funds. The department is not responsible for the audit or approval of
each of the qualified recipient's transactions involving funds.
(c) The department may initiate any of the following actions if a
qualified recipient does not submit a schedule of uses of funds for
eligible activities:
(i) Disqualification of the qualified recipient in pending
applications for the Affordable Housing Trust Fund;
(ii) Disqualification of the qualified recipient in pending
applications for other department programs;
(iii) Disqualification of the qualified recipient as an eligible
-4-

LB1246 LB1246
2026 2026
applicant for Affordable Housing Trust Fund applications for up to
twenty-four months from the date of the department action; or
(iv) Other actions deemed necessary by the department to meet the
department's responsibility to ensure proper use of funds so long as such
actions do not unduly harm a qualified recipient's reputation and ability
to successfully operate in Nebraska. This subdivision does not prohibit
the department from taking appropriate actions against qualified
recipients that have committed illegal actions, such as fraud and theft.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2027, the department shall prescribe annual
reporting requirements to collect sufficient information from qualified
recipients to determine the amount of funds obligated to projects, the
repayment terms of such funds, and the current balance of funds unspent
or repaid. The reporting requirements shall also require qualified
recipients to provide an accounting of awards granted for the purpose
described in subdivision (10) of section 58-706, including the award
amount and estimates related to equity earned on homes purchased with
such awards. If a qualified recipient fails to meet the reporting
requirements of this subsection, such qualified recipient may be required
to return all awarded funds to the department and transfer equity
positions of recoverable housing assistance funds to the department to
the satisfaction of the department.
(5) (4) The Department of Economic Development shall fund in order
of priority as many applications as will utilize available funds less
actual administrative costs of the department in administering the
program. In administering the program the department may contract for
services or directly provide funds to other governmental entities or
instrumentalities.
(6)(a) (5)(a) The Department of Economic Development may recapture
any funds which were allocated to a qualified recipient for an eligible
project through an award agreement if such funds were not utilized for
eligible costs within the time of performance under the agreement and are
-5-

LB1246 LB1246
2026 2026
therefore therefor no longer obligated to the project.
(b) Upon completion of a project, the department shall recapture a
percentage of the funds which were allocated to a qualified recipient for
an eligible project through an award agreement equal to the percentage of
the housing development the qualified recipient agreed to construct under
the award agreement but failed to complete. Any funds recaptured under
this subdivision shall be credited to the Affordable Housing Trust Fund.
(c) A qualified recipient shall recapture any funds allocated to
such recipient from the Affordable Housing Trust Fund that are provided
to a homebuyer by the recipient as financial assistance for the purchase
of a home upon sale of such home from the net proceeds of such sale, if
any.
Sec. 4. Original section 58-201, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, and section 58-708, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
are repealed.
-6-